Hawaii statutes.
§431:10-205 Interest of the insured.
When the name of a person intended to be insured is specified in the policy,
the insurance can be applied only to the person's own proper interest. This
section shall not apply to life insurance or accident and health or sickness
insurance. [L 1987, c 347, pt of §2; am L 2002, c 155, §40]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next